src/morphology/roots/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUM_MILJOONA
0:a     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0       NUM_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A      ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN     ;
0       NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:a     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0       NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;


LEXICON NUM_MILJARDI
0:i NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:i NUM_BACK_SINGULARS   ;
0:e NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:i NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A    ;
0:i NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN    ;
0:e NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA   ;
0:e NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0   NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;


LEXICON NUM_GOOGOL
0   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:i NUM_BACK_SINGULARS   ;
0:e NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
0:i NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A    ;
0:i NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN    ;
0:e NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA   ;
0:e NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0   NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;

LEXICON NUM_PARI
0:i     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i     NUM_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_PLURALS   ;
0:i     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:i     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0       NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;


LEXICON NUM_ENSIMMÄINEN
0:nen   NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:se    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:se    NUM_FRONT_SINGULARS   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
[DRV=S]:s    N_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON NUM_TOINEN
0:nen   NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:se    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:se    NUM_BACK_SINGULARS   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:s     NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;
[DRV=S]:s    N_COMPOUND     ;

LEXICON NUM_KOLMAS
0:s     NUM_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:nte   NUM_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:nne   NUM_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t     NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ns    NUM_BACK_PLURALS ;

LEXICON NUM_NELJÄS
0:s     NUM_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
0:nte   NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN    ;
0:nte   NUM_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS   ;
0:nne   NUM_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:t     NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ   ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ   ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ns    NUM_FRONT_PLURALS ;
